Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1342.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 314 of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended to read:Section 314. Fees and charges.(a) Imposition.--Whenever the department imposes fees or charges for activities, admissions, uses or privileges, including charges for concessions, at or relating to State 12345678910111213141516171819202122 parks, such charges or fees shall be used solely for the acquisition, maintenance, operation or administration of the State park system and are hereby appropriated for such purposes. The department shall not adopt or impose any charges or fees for parking or general admission to State parks unless the charges were imposed prior to January 1, 1995. The department may continue to impose and modify parking charges and fees applicable to specific services or units within the State park system which were imposed prior to January 1, 1995, and may impose charges or fees for admission to and for use of specific services and facilities in State parks. The department shall continue to exercise the powers previously vested in the Environmental Quality Board regarding the imposition of fees and charges for State parks and State forests.(b) Discount.--Upon presenting proper identification as determined by the department, the department shall provide a discount of 15% on all fees and charges for activities, admissions, uses or privileges, including charges for concessions, at or related to State parks to all of the following:(1) An active duty member of the United States Armed Forces.(2) A retired military member of the United States Armed Forces. PRICES FOR PICNIC PAVILIONS AND GROVES, OVERNIGHT CAMPING SITES, CABINS, COTTAGES, LODGE ROOMS AND ALL OTHER ROOFED OVERNIGHT FACILITIES OPERATED BY STATE PARKS AND STATE FORESTS TO ALL OF THE FOLLOWING: (1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES , INCLUDING A RESERVE COMPONENT OR NATIONAL GUARD . (2) A FORMER MEMBER OF THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES , 20250HB1342PN2042 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INCLUDING A RESERVE COMPONENT OR NATIONAL GUARD, WHOSE LAST DISCHARGE OR RELEASE WAS UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE.(3) A veteran of the United States Armed Forces who is 100% service-related disabled as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.(4) An immediate family member of an individual listed under paragraph (1), (2) or (3).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1342PN2042 - 3 - <--123456789